Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-19,108
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Title Insurance Agent Act:

(1) Abstract of title has the same meaning as in section 44-1981;

(2) Affiliated business means any portion of a title insurance agent's title insurance business written in this state that was referred to it by a producer of title insurance business or by an associate of the producer of title insurance business, if the producer of title insurance business or associate, or both, have a financial interest in the title insurance agent;

(3) Associate means any:

(a) Business organized for profit in which a producer of title insurance business is a director, an officer, a partner, an employee, or an owner of a financial interest;

(b) Employee of a producer of title insurance business;

(c) Franchisor or franchisee of a producer of title insurance business;

(d) Spouse, parent, or child of a producer of title insurance business who is a natural person;

(e) Person, other than a natural person, that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, a producer of title insurance business; and

(f) Person with whom a producer of title insurance business or any associate of the producer of title insurance business has an agreement, arrangement, or understanding, or pursues a course of conduct, the purpose or effect of which is to provide financial benefits to that producer of title insurance business or associate for the referral of title insurance business;

(4) Bona fide employee of the title insurance agent means an individual who devotes substantially all of his or her time to performing services on behalf of a title insurance agent and whose compensation for the services is in the form of salary or its equivalent paid by the title insurance agent;

(5) Bona fide employee of the title insurer has the same meaning as in section 44-1981;

(6) Director means the Director of Insurance;

(7) Escrow has the same meaning as in section 44-1981;

(8) Financial interest means a direct or indirect interest, legal or beneficial, when the holder is or will be entitled to five percent or more of the net profits or net worth of the entity in which the interest is held;

(9) Person means any natural person, partnership, association, cooperative, corporation, trust, or other legal entity;

(10) Producer of title insurance business means any person, including an officer, director, or owner of five percent or more of the equity or capital of any person, engaged in this state in the trade, business, occupation, or profession of:

(a) Buying or selling interests in real property;

(b) Making loans secured by interests in real property; or

(c) Acting as broker, agent, representative, or attorney of a person who buys or sells any interest in real property or who lends or borrows money with the interest as security;

(11) Qualified financial institution has the same meaning as in section 44-1981;

(12) Referral means the directing or the exercising of any power or influence over the direction of title insurance business, whether or not the consent or approval of any other person is sought or obtained with respect to the referral;

(13) Security or security deposit means funds or other property received by a title insurance agent as collateral to secure an indemnitor's obligation under an indemnity agreement pursuant to which a title insurer is granted a perfected security interest in the collateral in exchange for agreeing to provide coverage in a title insurance policy for a specific title exception to coverage;

(14) Title insurance agent means an authorized person, other than a bona fide employee of the title insurer, who, on behalf of the title insurer, performs the following acts in conjunction with the issuance of a title insurance commitment or title insurance policy:

(a) Determines insurability and issues title insurance commitments or title insurance policies, or both, based upon the performance or review of a title search or an abstract of title; and

(b) Performs one or more of the following functions:

(i) Collects or disburses premiums, escrow, or security deposits or other funds;

(ii) Handles escrows, settlements, or closings;

(iii) Solicits or negotiates title insurance business; or

(iv) Records closing documents;

(15) Title insurance business or business of title insurance means:

(a) Issuing as a title insurer or offering to issue as a title insurer a title insurance policy;

(b) Transacting or proposing to transact by a title insurance agent any of the following activities when conducted or performed in contemplation of or in conjunction with the issuance of a title insurance policy:

(i) Soliciting or negotiating the issuance of a title insurance policy;

(ii) Guaranteeing, warranting, or otherwise insuring the correctness of title searches for all instruments affecting titles to real property, any interest in real property, cooperative units, and proprietary leases and for all liens or charges affecting the same;

(iii) Handling of escrows, settlements, or closings;

(iv) Executing title insurance policies;

(v) Effecting contracts of reinsurance; or

(vi) Searching or examining titles;

(c) Guaranteeing, warranting, or insuring searches or examinations of title to real property or any interest in real property;

(d) Guaranteeing or warranting the status of title as to ownership of or liens on real property by any person other than the principals to the transaction; or

(e) Transacting or proposing to transact any business substantially equivalent to any of the activities listed in this subdivision in a manner designed to evade the provisions of the Title Insurance Agent Act;

(16) Title insurance commitment has the same meaning as in section 44-1981;

(17) Title insurance policy has the same meaning as in section 44-1981; and

(18) Title insurer has the same meaning as in section 44-1981.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 31;

Laws 2001, LB 360, § 11.